West Virginia, session 2026, SB104.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 1. Office of Miners’ Health, Safety, and Training; Administration; Enforcement. §22A-1-10a. Salary increase for state mine inspectors and other inspectors. State mine inspectors, including electrical inspectors, underground mine inspectors, surface mine inspectors, and any other class of inspector described in this chapter, shall receive a $5,000 salary increase on the effective date of this section. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. To take effect July 1, 2026.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home